Louisiana, session 2026, HB406.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1.(A) The legislature finds and declares that the direction and regulation of
interscholastic high school athletics is a public purpose that should be conducted in a
transparent manner that is fair for all students. The legislature further finds and declares that
all laws, rules, and regulations relative to interscholastic high school athletics should align
with academic priorities and foster an environment that places education at the forefront.
(B) The legislature finds and declares that House Concurrent Resolution No. 24 of
the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature created a special committee of the legislature
to conduct a comprehensive study of the Louisiana High School Athletic Association's
policies, governance structure, and impact on public, private, and parochial schools and
provided for the submission of a report of findings and recommendations to the House
Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education not later than February
14, 2026.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 406 ENROLLED
(C) The legislature finds and declares that over the course of six months of meetings,
the committee heard substantial testimony, received evidence, and discussed a wide variety
of issues pertaining to interscholastic high school athletics, including the significant
challenges associated with having high school athletics directed and regulated by a private
entity that is not subject to laws applicable to public entities such as the laws pertaining to
audit by the legislative auditor, the Open Meetings Law, and the Public Records Law and
whose rules are not subject to legislative oversight and have the potential to be inconsistently
applied with no recourse by parents, student-athletes, school systems, or the legislature. The
committee found that the current governance structure can be devoid of elements of fairness,
consistency, and compliance with the governing association's own regulations, which is
detrimental to the elements of fairness and structure that Louisiana's students, schools, and
parents deserve.
(D) The legislature finds and declares that the committee unanimously adopted the
recommendation that interscholastic high school athletics be regulated and directed through
a cooperative endeavor agreement between the state Department of Education and a
nonprofit corporation as provided in an Act of the legislature.
(E) The legislature finds and declares that further study by the state Department of
Education is needed for the purpose of advising the legislature about the potential
implementation and impact of such an agreement in order to inform legislation to be filed
during the 2027 Regular Session of the Legislature.
Section 2. R.S. 17:176.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§176.3. Interscholastic high school athletics; direction and regulation; study; report
A. The state Department of Education shall conduct a study on the feasibility
of the direction and regulation of interscholastic high school athletics through a
cooperative endeavor agreement with a nonprofit corporation which would be
subject to the basic tenets of fairness, impartiality, and responsiveness expected by
the state for the benefit of student athletes.
B. The department shall conduct the study based on all of the following
assumptions:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 406 ENROLLED
(1) That such cooperative endeavor agreement would be subject to rules that
the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, referred to in this Section
as the "state board", would adopt for such purpose.
(2) That the nonprofit corporation would be subject to audit by the legislative
auditor, the Open Meetings Law, and the Public Records Law, any exceptions to
which regarding the confidentiality of student information would apply.
(3) That all interscholastic high school athletic competitions for public high
schools and nonpublic high schools that receive state funds would be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of applicable state law, state board rules, and the
provisions of the cooperative endeavor agreement.
(4) That the provisions of the cooperative endeavor agreement would
include, at a minimum, regulations pertaining to eligibility, student health and safety,
penalties, appeals, administration, and game play.
(5) That no public high school or nonpublic high school that receives state
funds would be permitted to be a member of, or participate in any competition
sponsored by, any intrastate interscholastic extracurricular athletic association or
organization.
(6) That the direction and regulation of interscholastic high school athletics
in this manner would apply beginning with the 2028-2029 school year.
C. The department shall submit a written report of findings and conclusions
to the House Committee on Education, the House Committee on Appropriations, the
Senate Committee on Education, and the Senate Committee on Finance not later than
March 1, 2027, that shall include, at a minimum, the following:
(1) Potential nonprofit corporations with which to execute such a cooperative
endeavor agreement.
(2) A plan of action and potential timeline for how such a cooperative
endeavor agreement would be implemented beginning with the 2028-2029 school
year.
(3) Funding and cost considerations.
(4) Transitional considerations.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 406 ENROLLED
(5) Recommendations relative to legislation necessary to fully implement the
direction and regulation of interscholastic athletics through such a cooperative
endeavor agreement.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.